Utah statutes.
76-8-704.   Violation of rule or regulation of institution -- Failure to
leave when ordered.
If a person enters upon the campus of a private or state institution of higher
education or other facility owned or controlled by the governing board of the
institution and violates any rule or regulation of the institution, the chief
administrative officer or an officer or employee designated by him to maintain
order on the campus or facility may inform the person of the regulation and
its violation. If the person does not immediately cease and desist from
violating the rule or regulation, the chief administrative officer, or officer
or employee designated by him to maintain order on the campus or related
facility, may direct the person to leave the campus or facility, and if the
person fails so to do, he is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
